Arkansas, session 2025, HB1244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-87-314(b)(1), concerning the
requirements to obtain a certificate of full independent practice authority
by a certified nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist, is amended to
read as follows:
(b)(1) The Full Independent Practice Credentialing Committee may grant
a certificate of full independent practice authority to a certified nurse
practitioner or a clinical nurse specialist who submits:
(A) An application;
(B) An appropriate application fee as determined by the
Full Independent Practice Credentialing Committee;
(C) Proof of successful completion of six thousand two
*JMB118*
01/27/2025 9:54:49 AM JMB118

HB1244
hundred forty (6,240) two thousand (2,000) hours of practice:
(i) Under a board-required collaborative practice
agreement with a physician; or
(ii) From another state, territory, or foreign
country that authorizes a certified nurse practitioner or a clinical nurse
specialist to practice with prescriptive authority if the certified nurse
practitioner or clinical nurse specialist:
(a) Has prescriptive authority in the state,
territory, or foreign country; and
(b) Provides proof of his or her licensure in
good standing from:
(1) The state, territory, or foreign
country; and
(2) The Arkansas State Board of Nursing;
and
(D) Any other relevant information as determined by the
Full Independent Practice Credentialing Committee.



















01/27/2025 9:54:49 AM JMB118